Utah statutes.
41-12a-408.   Substitution of forms of proof of owner's or operator's
security.
The department shall consent to the cancellation of any bond or certificate of
insurance or the department shall direct and the state treasurer shall return
any money or securities to the person entitled to them upon the substitution
and acceptance of other adequate proof of owner's or operator's security in a
manner allowed under Section 41-12a-401.
